Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Standards and Schedules.
Sec. 11.71.210.
Purchase or receipt of restricted amounts of certain listed chemicals.

A person commits the crime of purchase or receipt of restricted amounts of certain listed chemicals if the person purchases or receives more than six grams of the following listed chemical, its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers within any 30-day period:

ephedrine under AS

11.71.200

(4);

pseudoephedrine under AS

11.71.200

(13);

phenylpropanolamine under AS 11.71.200(11).

This section does not apply to a person who lawfully purchases or receives

more than six grams of a listed chemical identified in (a) of this section

that was dispensed to the person under a valid prescription; or

in the ordinary course of a legitimate business, or to an employee of a legitimate business, as a

retailer or as a wholesaler;

wholesale drug distributor licensed by the Board of Pharmacy;

manufacturer of drug products licensed by the Board of Pharmacy;

pharmacist licensed by the Board of Pharmacy; or

health care professional licensed by the state; or

more than six but less than 24 grams of a listed chemical identified in (a) of this section in the ordinary course of a legitimate business or nonprofit organization, or as an employee of a legitimate business or nonprofit organization, operating a camp, lodge, school, day care center, treatment center, or other organized group activity, and the location or nature of the activity, or the age of the participants, makes it impractical for the participants in the activity to obtain medicinal products.

Purchase or receipt of restricted amounts of certain listed chemicals is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 12 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”